California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 7.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.36.

(a) The bureau shall annually conduct a minimum of one unannounced inspection of each reduction facility and each licensed hydrolysis facility.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 8.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.4.

The bureau shall inspect the books, records, and premises of any cemetery where a certificate of authority is required under this chapter. In making the inspections, the bureau shall have access to all books and records, buildings, mausoleums, columbariums, storage areas, including storage areas for human remains, during regular office hours or the hours the cemetery is in operation. No prior notification of the inspection is required to be given to the holder of the certificate of authority. If any certificate holder fails to allow the inspection or any part thereof, disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, revocation or suspension may be taken against the certificate of authority. All disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted in
 accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.5.

The bureau shall annually conduct a minimum of one unannounced inspection of each cemetery for which a certificate of authority is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.6.

A cemetery licensed under this chapter shall at all times employ a licensed cemetery manager to manage, supervise, and direct its operations. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, licensed cemeteries within close geographical proximity of each other may request the bureau to allow a licensed cemetery manager to manage, supervise, and direct the business or profession of more than one facility.

(a) Every cemetery shall designate a licensed cemetery manager to manage the cemetery, and shall report the designation to the bureau within 10 days of the effective date. Any change in the designated manager shall be
 reported to the bureau within 10 days.

(b) The designated cemetery manager shall be responsible for exercising direct supervision and control over the operations, employees, and agents of the cemetery as is necessary to ensure full compliance with the applicable provisions of this code, the Health and Safety Code, and any regulations adopted thereto. Failure of the designated cemetery manager or the licensed cemetery to exercise that supervision or control shall constitute a ground for disciplinary action.

(c) A cemetery may employ, in addition to the designated cemetery manager, additional licensed cemetery managers. However, only one licensed cemetery manager may be
 appointed as the designated cemetery manager of the cemetery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.7.

(a) Application for a cemetery manager license shall be made in writing on the form provided by the bureau, verified by the applicant, and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(b) The applicant for a cemetery manager license shall be at least 18 years of age, possess a high school diploma or its equivalent, shall not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, shall demonstrate compliance with the training and experience requirements established by the bureau, and shall be a
 resident of this state.

(c) The bureau shall grant a cemetery manager license to any applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter and who has successfully passed the cemetery manager examination administered by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.8.

(a) A person shall not engage in or conduct, or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or conducting, the activities of a cemetery manager without holding a valid, unexpired cemetery manager license issued by the bureau.

(b) A licensed cemetery manager shall not engage in or conduct, or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or conducting, the activities of a cemetery manager without being employed by, or without being a corporate officer of a licensed cemetery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, based upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that a cemetery manager of a private cemetery has ceased to perform their duties, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7611.4, due to a lapse, suspension, surrender, abandonment, or revocation of their license, the court may appoint a temporary manager to manage the cemetery property and to service the prepaid interments of the private cemetery. The court shall appoint a licensed cemetery manager as the temporary manager.

(b) The appointed temporary manager shall have the same powers over the care and maintenance of the private cemetery as a licensed cemetery manager, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7611.4. The temporary manager shall serve for a limited
 term not to exceed six months, or until a new licensed manager has been hired, at which time the court shall terminate the appointment of the temporary manager.

(c) The court may authorize the payment of reasonable compensation for the temporary manager’s services, which shall be paid by the trustees from available income from the cemetery. In exercising its discretion pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall give due consideration to the ability of the cemetery income to otherwise pay for care and maintenance of the cemetery.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a court has not appointed a temporary manager within six months of the suspension, revocation, or surrender of the license of a cemetery manager of a private cemetery or the appointment of a temporary manager has expired, the county in which the cemetery is located may assume responsibility
 for the maintenance of the cemetery and may preserve public access to the cemetery until the court can appoint a temporary manager.

(2) If a county assumes maintenance responsibilities for a cemetery under this subdivision, the county shall be reimbursed from the available income in the endowment care fund for maintenance services rendered until a temporary care manager is appointed by the court or a new permanent cemetery manager is found.

(3) If a county assumes maintenance responsibilities for a cemetery under this subdivision, the county shall perform, at a minimum, all of the following maintenance services on the cemetery property:

(A) Keep cemetery grounds open for public access.

(B) Trim or mow grass and prune shrubs and trees on cemetery
 grounds.

(C) Keep public areas of the cemetery grounds and water features clear of trash and debris.

(D) Provide a supply of water to keep cemetery grass and plants as green as possible with consideration of water availability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 442, Sec. 3.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Apprentices [7660. - 7671.]

7660.

An apprentice embalmer is a person engaged in the study of embalming under the instruction and supervision of a licensed embalmer who has had at least two years’ practical experience as a California licensed embalmer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1151, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7661.

An application for registration as an embalmer’s apprentice shall be made upon a form provided by the bureau, verified by the applicant and accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7662.

In order to qualify as an apprentice embalmer, an applicant shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Be over 18 years of age.

(b) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(c) Do one of the following:

(1) Furnish proof showing completion of a high school course. 

(2) Furnish the bureau with evidence that he or she has been licensed and has practiced as an embalmer for a minimum of three years
 within the seven years preceding his or her application in any other state or country and that the license has never been suspended or revoked for unethical conduct.

(3) Have graduated from a mortuary science program approved by the bureau and accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education, or its equivalent, as determined by the bureau, and furnished official transcripts from that program or equivalent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 89.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7664.

Certificates of apprenticeship issued pursuant to this article shall expire when the holder has been issued a license as an embalmer, or six years from the date of registration, whichever first occurs. The certificates may not be renewed, but an apprentice embalmer who has not completed his or her term of apprenticeship at the time his or her certificate expires may apply for reregistration upon compliance with Section 7661. The bureau may, when the circumstances warrant, allow an apprentice credit under a reregistration for the time actually served under a previous registration, but no reregistration shall have the effect of continuing the term of apprenticeship beyond the period specified in Section 7666.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7665.

All registered apprentice embalmers shall comply with the following requirements during their period of apprenticeship:

(a) Shall file a report of apprenticeship as follows:

(1) On or before January 15 of each year covering the period of apprenticeship ending as of December 31 preceding.

(2) Upon change of supervising embalmer or employer, or both.

(3) Upon completion of apprenticeship.

(4) Upon application for leave of absence for a period in excess of 15 days.

(5) Upon suspending apprenticeship to attend a mortuary science program.

(6) Upon application for reregistration after suspension or revocation of registration if a complete report of previous registration has not been filed.

(b) The information contained in the report shall consist of a concise summary of the work done by the apprentice during the period covered thereby, shall be verified by the apprentice and certified to as correct by his or her supervising embalmer and employer. Upon request of the bureau, each funeral director in whose establishment an apprenticeship is being, or has been, served, and each embalmer under whose instruction or supervision an apprenticeship is being or has been served, shall promptly file with the bureau a report or such other information as may be requested relating to the
 apprenticeship. Failure to comply with the request is cause for revocation by the bureau of the approval granted to the funeral director or embalmer for the training of apprentices and is also a cause for disciplinary action against the funeral director or embalmer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 90.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7666.

(a) The term of apprenticeship shall be two years. However, if an apprentice after having served his or her apprenticeship fails to pass the examinations required for an embalmer’s license, he or she may continue for one additional term of apprenticeship, which shall be the maximum apprenticeship permitted and provided further that an apprentice may, upon filing an application therefor, be permitted to continue the apprenticeship for a period not to exceed six months, if approved, for any of the following reasons:

(1) While awaiting the processing of applications submitted to the bureau.

(2) While awaiting notification of grades of examinations required under
 Section 7646.

(3) While awaiting the commencement of a class of a mortuary science program when the apprentice intends to enroll in the program.

Applications filed for an extension of apprenticeship shall be filed by the applicant with the bureau not fewer than 15 days prior to the date the applicant requests the extension to commence.

(b) Terms of apprenticeship may be served before, after, or divided by the mortuary science program at the option of the apprentice; provided, however, that the term of apprenticeship must be completed, excluding time spent in active military service, within six years from the date of original registration, or from the date an apprentice successfully passes the examinations for an embalmer’s license required in Section 7646, whichever first occurs, and provided further that if the term of apprenticeship is
 not completed within the six-year period, the bureau may require that the applicant serve the additional term of apprenticeship, not to exceed two years.

(c) A student attending a mortuary science program may register as an apprentice during the program term but shall receive no credit for apprenticeship on the term required by this code unless he or she is also a full-time employee of a funeral director.

(d) An apprentice while serving his or her required term of apprenticeship shall be a full-time employee in the funeral establishment in which he or she is employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 91.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7667.

(a) The bureau shall have the power to grant leaves of absence and extensions of leaves of absence and approve absences during the term of apprenticeship.

(b) A leave of absence, including any extensions, shall not be approved for a longer period than an aggregate of one year.

(c) No credit will be given to an apprentice on his or her apprenticeship for the period during which he or she is absent from duty on leave.

(d) Application for a leave of absence and for an extension thereof shall be made by the apprentice on a form provided by the bureau.

(e) Upon termination of a leave of absence, the apprentice shall report that fact to the bureau within 10 days of his or her resumption of apprenticeship by returning to the bureau, his or her certificate of registration accompanied by a statement as to the resumption of apprenticeship which statement shall be certified as correct by the funeral director in whose establishment he or she is to resume his or her duties and by the embalmer under whose supervision he or she is to resume his or her apprenticeship.

(f) Failure to report within 10 days after the expiration date of any leave of absence shall be cause for cancellation of the registration of an apprentice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7668.

The bureau may suspend or revoke a certificate of apprenticeship, after notice and upon complaint and hearing in accordance with the provisions of Article 6, if the apprentice is guilty of any of the following acts or omissions:

(a) Failure to devote full-time employment to the duties of his or her apprenticeship.

(b) Failure to make any report required by this chapter.

(c) Absence from duty except as provided in this code.

(d) Being on duty as an apprentice while under the influence of any controlled substance, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4015) of Chapter 9 of the Business and Professions Code, or alcoholic beverages or other intoxicating substances, to an extent dangerous or injurious to himself, herself, any person, or the public to the extent that such use impairs his or her ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by his or her certification.

(e) Disobedience of proper orders or instructions of his or her superior.

(f) Violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the bureau.

(g) Soliciting business for a funeral director or for an embalmer in violation of this chapter.

(h) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a certificate of registration as an apprentice.

(i) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of an apprentice, in which case the record of conviction, or a certified copy, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7669.

An apprentice who has had his or her certificate of apprenticeship suspended or revoked may, within one year after the suspension or revocation apply for reregistration upon compliance with the law in effect at the time he or she so applies and payment of the apprentice application fee fixed by this chapter. No reregistration shall have the effect of continuing an apprenticeship beyond the period specified in Section 7666.

The bureau may, when the circumstances warrant, allow an apprentice credit under a reregistration for the time actually served under a previous registration, but if the previous registration has been suspended or revoked for unprofessional conduct, not more than 75 percent of the time previously served shall be credited on the reregistration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7670.

(a) The apprenticeship required by this article shall be served in a licensed funeral establishment that shall have been previously approved for apprenticeship training by the bureau. In order to qualify for approval, the funeral establishment shall submit to the bureau an application, accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter, showing:

(1) That not less than 50 human remains per apprentice employed have been embalmed in the establishment during the 12 months immediately
 preceding the date of the application.

(2) That the applicant has, and will continue to have,
 for each two apprentices employed by the establishment, a full-time employed California embalmer who has had not less than two years’ practical experience as a California licensed embalmer immediately preceding the date of the application or a trade embalmer who is hired by the establishment on a case-by-case basis who has had not less than two years’ practical experience as a California licensed embalmer immediately preceding the date of the application.

(3) That the licensed funeral establishment applicant meets the requirements of law as to equipment, cleanliness and sanitation as determined by an inspection report filed with the bureau.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a trade embalmer, as described in paragraph (2), from acting as
 the supervising embalmer of an apprentice pursuant to this section.

(b) Licensed funeral establishments under common ownership within close geographical proximity of each other may request any of the following from the bureau:

(1) To be treated in aggregate for the purpose of meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) To designate one additional supervising embalmer per registered apprentice.

(3) To allow a registered apprentice to serve in any or all of the licensed funeral establishments requested and approved pursuant to this section.

(c) Approval granted under
 this section shall be renewed annually upon application by the funeral establishment showing continued compliance with the foregoing provisions of this section, filed with the bureau not later than January 15 of each year. An application for renewal shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, “trade embalmer” means a person who is an independent California licensed embalmer who embalms dead human bodies on a contractual basis for one or more California licensed funeral establishments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7671.

No person who is a duly registered apprentice or a student at an approved mortuary science program in California at the time of any amendment to this chapter raising the requirements for apprentice embalmers or license as an embalmer shall be required to comply with the provisions of that amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 92.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Cremated Remains Disposer [7672. - 7673.2.]

7672.

(a) A person shall not dispose of or offer to dispose of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains unless registered as a cremated remains disposer by the bureau. This article shall not apply to a person, partnership, or corporation holding a certificate of authority as a cemetery, crematory license, hydrolysis facility license, cemetery broker’s license, cemetery salesperson’s license, or funeral director’s license, nor shall this article apply to a person having the right to control the disposition of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains of a person or that person’s designee if the person does not dispose of, or offer to dispose of, more than 10 cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains within any calendar
 year.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 9.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 10 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.

(a) A person shall not dispose of, or offer to dispose of, cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains unless registered as a cremated remains disposer by the bureau. This article does not apply to a person, partnership, or corporation holding a certificate of authority as a cemetery, crematory license, reduction facility, hydrolysis facility license, cemetery broker’s license, cemetery salesperson’s license, or funeral director’s license, nor shall this article apply to a person having the right to control the disposition of the cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains of a person or that person’s designee if the person does not dispose of, or offer to dispose of, more than 10 human remains within a calendar year.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 10.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.1.

(a) Registration shall be on the form prescribed by the bureau and shall include, but not be limited to, the full name of the registrant, business and residence addresses, description and identification of aircraft or boats that may be used in dispensing cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains, and the area to be served. Each registration application shall be accompanied by the cremated remains disposer fee.

(b) Every registered cremated remains disposer who dispenses human remains by air shall post a copy of the person’s current pilot’s license, and the address of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains storage area at their place of business. Every registered
 cremated remains disposer who dispenses human remains by boat shall post a copy of the person’s current boating license and the address of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains storage area at their place of business.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2027, every registered cremated remains disposer who integrates reduced human remains into the soil shall post a copy of the address of the reduced human remains storage area at their place of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 11.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.2.

(a) The bureau shall prepare and deliver to each registered cremated remains disposer a booklet that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: details about the registration and renewal requirements for cremated remains disposers; requirements for obtaining state permits to dispose of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains; state storage requirements, if any; statutory duties pursuant to this article, and other applicable state laws.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 12.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 13 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.2.

(a) The bureau shall prepare and deliver to each registered cremated remains disposer a booklet that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: details about the registration and renewal requirements for cremated remains disposers; requirements for obtaining state permits to dispose of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains; state storage requirements, if any; statutory duties pursuant to this article, and other applicable state laws.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 13.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.3.

(a) All aircraft used for the scattering of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains shall be validly certified by the Federal Aviation Administration. All boats or vessels used for the scattering of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains shall be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles or documented by a federal agency, as appropriate. The certification or registration shall be available for inspection by the bureau.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 14.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.4.

(a) A cremated remains disposer who scatters cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains without specific written instructions from the person having the right to control the disposition of the remains or who scatters remains in a manner not in accordance with those instructions shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 14.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 15 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.4.

(a) A cremated remains disposer who scatters cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains or who integrates reduced human remains into the soil without specific written instructions from the person having the right to control the disposition of the remains or who scatters or integrates into the soil human remains in a manner not in accordance with those instructions shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 15.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.5.

Each cremated remains disposer shall provide the person with the right to control the disposition of the remains under Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code with a copy of the completed permit for disposition of human remains pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 103050) of Part 1 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code within 30 days of the date of the scattering.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 20.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.6.

(a) Every cremated remains disposer shall do both of the following:

(1) Dispose of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains within 60 days of the receipt of those remains, unless a written signed reason for a delay is presented to the person with the right to control the disposition of the remains under Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Provide the bureau with the address and telephone number of any storage facility being used by the registrant to store cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains. Cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains shall be stored in a place free from exposure to the
 elements, and shall be responsibly maintained until disposal. The bureau and its representatives shall conduct, on an annual basis, random inspections of the operations of 5 to 10 percent of the registered cremated remains disposers, and is authorized to inspect any place used by a cremated remains disposer for the storage of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains without notice to the cremated remains disposer.

(b) A violation of the requirements of this section is grounds for disciplinary action.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 16.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 17 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.6.

(a) Every cremated remains disposer shall do both of the following:

(1) Dispose of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains within 60 days of the receipt of those remains, unless a written signed reason for a delay is presented to the person with the right to control the disposition of the remains under Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Provide the bureau with the address and telephone number of any storage facility being used by the registrant to store cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains. Cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains shall be stored in a place free
 from exposure to the elements, and shall be responsibly maintained until disposal. The bureau and its representatives shall conduct, on an annual basis, random inspections of the operations of 5 to 10 percent of the registered cremated remains disposers, and may inspect any place used by a cremated remains disposer for the storage of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains without notice to the cremated remains disposer.

(b) A violation of the requirements of this section is grounds for disciplinary action.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 17.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.7.

(a) Each cremated remains disposer shall file, and thereafter maintain, an updated copy of, an annual report on a form prescribed by the bureau. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the names of the deceased persons whose cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains were disposed of, the dates of receipt of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains, the names and addresses of the persons who authorized disposal of those remains, the dates and locations of disposal of those remains, and the means and manner of disposition. The report shall cover the fiscal year ending on June 30 and shall be filed with the bureau no later than September 30 of each year.

(b) A cremated
 remains disposer that makes a willful and material false statement regarding the disposal of cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains in the annual report filed or updated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(c) A cremated remains disposer that makes a willful and material false statement in the annual report filed or updated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 18.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 19 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.7.

(a) Each cremated remains disposer shall file, and thereafter maintain, an updated copy of, an annual report on a form prescribed by the bureau. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the names of the deceased persons whose cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains were disposed of, the dates of receipt of the cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains, the names and addresses of the persons who authorized disposal of those remains, the dates and locations of disposal of those remains, and the means and manner of disposition. The report shall cover the fiscal year ending on June 30 and shall be filed with the bureau no later than September 30 of each year.

(b) A cremated remains disposer who makes a willful and material false statement regarding the disposal of cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains in the annual report filed or updated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action.

(c) A cremated remains disposer who makes a willful and material false statement in the annual report filed or updated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 19.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.8.

All cremated remains disposer registrations shall expire at midnight on September 30 of each year. A person desiring to renew his or her registration shall file an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the bureau accompanied by the required fee. A registration that has expired may be renewed within five years of its expiration upon payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. The bureau shall not renew the registration of any person who has not filed the required annual report until he or she has filed a complete annual report with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 20.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.9.

If a person fails to apply for renewal of his or her cremated remains disposer registration prior to midnight of September 30 of the year for which the registration was issued, no renewal shall be issued except upon payment of the delinquent renewal fee required under Section 7729.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 20.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7672.10.

(a) A person who scatters cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains without a valid registration and who is not otherwise exempt from this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The remains of each person scattered shall constitute a separate violation.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person who integrates reduced human remains into the soil without a valid registration and who is not otherwise exempt from this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The remains of each person integrated into the
 soil shall constitute a separate violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 20.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.

(a) A person who scatters any cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains without specific written instructions from the person having the right to control the disposition of the remains or who scatters remains in a manner not in accordance with those instructions shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2027, a person who integrates reduced human remains into the soil without specific written instructions from the person having the right to control the disposition of the remains, or
 who integrates reduced human remains into the soil in a manner not in accordance with those instructions shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 21.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.1.

(a) A cremated remains disposer who stores cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains in a reckless manner that results in either of the following is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) Loss of all or part of the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains.

(2) Inability to individually identify the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains.

(b) This section shall remain in
 effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 22.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 23 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.1.

(a) A cremated remains disposer who stores cremated, reduced, or hydrolyzed human remains in a reckless manner that results in either of the following is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) Loss of all or part of the human remains.

(2) Inability to individually identify the human remains.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 23.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7673.2.

A cremated remains disposer shall be subject to and shall be disciplined by the bureau in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 7686). Any violation of this article shall also be grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 20.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licenses [7680. - 7680.]

7680.

Every license issued shall be displayed conspicuously in the place of business or employment of the licensee.
